California, session 20252026, AB1967.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 329 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:329. (a) (1) When a person applies to the social worker to commence proceedings in the juvenile court, the application shall be in the form of an affidavit alleging that there was or is within the county, or residing therein, a child within the provisions of Section 300, and setting forth facts in support thereof. The social worker shall immediately investigate as necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced. If the social worker does not take action under Section 301 and does not file a petition in the juvenile court within three weeks after the application, the social worker shall endorse upon the affidavit of the applicant the decision not to proceed further, including any recommendation made to the applicant, if one is made, to consider commencing a probate guardianship proceeding for the child, and the reasons therefor and shall immediately notify the applicant of the action taken or the decision rendered under this section. The social worker shall retain the affidavit and the endorsement thereon for a period of 30 days after notifying the applicant.(2) The affidavit may be submitted to the social worker by mail, facsimile, or electronic mail.(b) (1) If a social worker receives a referral from the probate court pursuant to Section 1513 of the Probate Code, the social worker shall immediately investigate as necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced.(2) The social worker shall, within three weeks of the referral, report the findings and conclusions of the investigation, along with any decision made as a result and the reasons for the decision, to the probate court as required by subdivision (b) of Section 1513 of the Probate Code.(c) If an application, as described in subdivision (a), is submitted by a minor on their own behalf, or by the minor’s attorney, and the minor is currently residing at a residential facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, for children and youth, the social worker shall, when conducting a safety assessment or substitute care provider safety assessment, also assess the safety of the home of those who hold custodial rights of the minor.SEC. 2. Section 331 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:331. (a) If a person has applied to the social worker, pursuant to Section 329, to commence juvenile court proceedings and the social worker does not file a petition within three weeks after the application, the person may, within one month after making the application, apply to the juvenile court to review the decision of the social worker, and the court may either affirm the decision of the social worker or, if it finds that the child is, prima facie, described by Section 300, order the social worker to commence juvenile court proceedings.(b) If the probate court has referred a matter to the child welfare agency pursuant to Section 1513 of the Probate Code, and the agency does not file a petition to commence juvenile court proceedings within three weeks of the referral, the probate court or counsel appointed by the probate court pursuant to Section 1470 of the Probate Code to represent the child may, within one month after the referral, request that the juvenile court review the decision of the social worker not to file a petition. The request shall contain the probate court referral made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1513 of the Probate Code and the social worker’s report, if available to the court, and need not contain any additional information. The juvenile court may either affirm the decision of the social worker or, if it finds that the child is, prima facie, described by Section 300, order the social worker to commence juvenile court proceedings.(1) Either the appointment of a temporary probate guardian or any delay attributable to the child welfare investigation shall not preclude the juvenile court from ordering the social worker to commence dependency proceedings or from hearing and determining a petition alleging that the child is described by Section 300.(2) The juvenile court shall, within five days of completing its review, transmit its decision, in writing, to the probate court. The probate court shall file the decision in question in the guardianship proceeding and shall make it available only to persons entitled to receive reports pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1513 of the Probate Code.(c) If a minor or their attorney has applied on the minor’s own behalf to the social worker, pursuant to Section 329, to commence juvenile court proceedings, the social worker does not file a petition within three weeks after the application, and the minor has applied to the juvenile court to review the decision of the social worker pursuant to subdivision (a), the juvenile court shall review the decision and either affirm the decision or order the social worker to commence juvenile court proceedings within 14 days of the minor’s application to the court for review.SEC. 3. Section 388.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:388.1. (a) A nonminor who has not attained 21 years of age may petition the court in which the nonminor was previously found to be a dependent or delinquent child of the juvenile court for a hearing to determine whether to assume dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor, if the nonminor meets any of the following descriptions:(1) The nonminor is a nonminor former dependent, as defined in subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, who received or, but for the receipt of Supplemental Security Income benefits or other aid from the federal Social Security Administration, would have received aid after attaining 18 years of age under Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9, or AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, and whose former guardian or guardians died after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(2) The nonminor is a nonminor former dependent, as defined in subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, who received or, but for the receipt of Supplemental Security Income benefits or other aid from the federal Social Security Administration, would have received aid after attaining 18 years of age under Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9, or AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, and whose former guardian or guardians no longer provide ongoing support to the nonminor after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(3) The nonminor is a nonminor who received adoption assistance payments after attaining 18 years of age pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9 and their adoptive parent or parents died after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(4) The nonminor is a nonminor who received adoption assistance payments after attaining 18 years of age pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9 and their adoptive parent or parents no longer provide ongoing support to the nonminor after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(b) (1) The petition to assume jurisdiction may be filed in either of the following:(A) The juvenile court that established the guardianship pursuant to Section 360, Section 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728.(B) The juvenile court that had jurisdiction over the minor or nonminor dependent when their adoption was finalized.(2) A nonminor described in subdivision (a) may submit a petition to assume dependency jurisdiction to the juvenile court in the county where the nonminor resides. A petition submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall, within five days of submission, be forwarded to the court that had jurisdiction over the child at the time of the guardianship or adoption. The clerk of the court that had jurisdiction over the child at the time of the guardianship or adoption shall file the petition within one judicial day of receipt.(c) (1) The juvenile court in which the petition was filed shall order a hearing to be held within 15 judicial days of the date the petition was filed if there is a prima facie showing that the nonminor satisfies all of the following criteria:(A) The nonminor was a minor under juvenile court jurisdiction at the time of the establishment of a guardianship pursuant to Section 360, Section 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728, or the nonminor was a minor or nonminor dependent when their adoption was finalized.(B) (i) Their guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, died after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before the nonminor attained 21 years of age.(ii) Their guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, no longer provide ongoing support to the nonminor after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before the nonminor attained 21 years of age, and it may be in the nonminor’s best interest for the court to assume dependency jurisdiction.(C) The nonminor intends to satisfy at least one of the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(D) The nonminor is requesting assistance in maintaining or securing appropriate supervised placement, or needs immediate placement and agrees to supervised placement pursuant to the voluntary reentry agreement described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(2) Upon ordering a hearing, the court shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the nonminor, the appropriate child welfare agency or probation department, and any other person requested by the nonminor in the petition.(3) Pursuant to applicable rules of court, the juvenile court shall allow for telephonic appearances by the nonminor in these proceedings and in any proceeding in which the nonminor dependent is a party.(4) Prior to the hearing, the court shall order the county child welfare or probation department to prepare a report for the court that addresses both of the following:(A) The nonminor’s plans to satisfy at least one of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(B) The appropriate placement setting for the nonminor. When the recommendation is for the nonminor to be placed in a setting where minor dependents also reside, the results of a background check of the petitioning nonminor conducted pursuant to Section 16504.5 may be used by the placing agency to determine appropriate placement options for the nonminor.(5) The court shall assume dependency jurisdiction over a former dependent or ward, and order their placement and care be under the responsibility of the county child welfare services department, the probation department, tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization, if the court finds all of the following:(A) The nonminor was a minor under juvenile court jurisdiction at the time of the establishment of a guardianship pursuant to Section 360, Section 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728, or the nonminor was a dependent at the time their adoption was finalized.(B) The nonminor’s guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, have died, or no longer provide ongoing support to the nonminor, and it is in the nonminor’s best interests for the court to assume dependency jurisdiction.(C) The nonminor has not attained 21 years of age.(D) Reentry and remaining in foster care are in the nonminor’s best interests.(E) The nonminor intends to satisfy, and agrees to satisfy, at least one of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, and demonstrates their agreement to placement in a supervised setting under the placement and care responsibility of the placing agency by signing the voluntary reentry agreement described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(6) The existence of a criminal conviction is not a bar to eligibility for reentry to foster care or assumption of dependency jurisdiction over a nonminor.(7) The court shall not grant a continuance that would cause the hearing to be completed more than 120 days after the date the petition is filed.(d) The agency made responsible for the nonminor’s placement and care pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) shall prepare a new transitional independent living case plan within 60 calendar days of the date the nonminor signs the voluntary reentry agreement and shall submit the plan to the court for the review hearing specified in Section 366.31, to be held within 70 days of the assumption of dependency jurisdiction. The review hearing under Section 366.31 shall not be held more than 170 calendar days from the date the nonminor signs the voluntary reentry agreement.(e) (1) A nonminor described in subdivision (a) may enter into a voluntary reentry agreement as defined in subdivision (z) of Section 11400 in order to establish eligibility for foster care benefits under subdivision (e) of Section 11401 before or after filing a petition to assume dependency jurisdiction if either of the following apply:(A) The nonminor’s guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, have died.(B) The nonminor is no longer receiving ongoing support from the nonminor’s guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents.(2) If the nonminor enters into a voluntary reentry agreement prior to filing the petition, the nonminor is entitled to placement and supervision pending the court’s assumption of jurisdiction.(3) If the nonminor completes a voluntary reentry agreement with a placing agency, the placing agency shall file the petition to assume dependency jurisdiction on behalf of the nonminor within 15 judicial days of the date the agreement is signed, unless the nonminor elects to file the petition at an earlier date.(4) (A) If the nonminor enters into a voluntary reentry agreement, the juvenile court shall order that any benefits being paid on behalf of the nonminor under Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9, under AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, or under the adoption assistance program pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9, be suspended, in accordance with the procedures for terminating benefits, until the juvenile court determines that it should not assume dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor or until the juvenile court terminates dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor subsequent to assuming dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor pursuant to this section, as applicable. The suspension of payments pursuant to this paragraph does not authorize or require an accounting or investigation regarding the use of payments made prior to the suspension.(B) Suspension under this paragraph shall be effective as of the date the nonminor executes the voluntary reentry agreement, unless the court specifies a different effective date not later than the first day of the next benefit cycle.(C) Within one business day of execution of the voluntary reentry agreement, the placing agency shall provide electronic notice of suspension to the appropriate payment system or systems and payor or payors to prevent further disbursements.(D) Any overpayment made after the effective date of suspension is recoverable from the payee that received the disbursement and shall not create any liability for the nonminor.(E) An order or action taken pursuant to this paragraph suspends disbursements only and shall not be construed as a termination of an adoption assistance agreement or Kin-GAP eligibility under federal or state law.(5) “Ongoing support,” as used in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), means material financial support provided to the nonminor on a continuing basis, and may include, but is not limited to, housing, food, clothing, tuition, payment for treatment or services, or other in kind or cash assistance provided directly to or for the benefit of the nonminor. “Ongoing support” does not include incidental or de minimis assistance.(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department State Department of Social Services may implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until January 1, 2028.SEC. 4. To the extent that this act has an overall effect of increasing the costs already borne by a local agency for programs or levels of service mandated by the 2011 Realignment Legislation within the meaning of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, it shall apply to local agencies only to the extent that the state provides annual funding for the cost increase. Any new program or higher level of service provided by a local agency pursuant to this act above the level for which funding has been provided shall not require a subvention of funds by the state or otherwise be subject to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.